District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.23

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this subchapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 24, 55 DCR 2532
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 24 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).